Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2052.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-7c04 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 75-7c04. (a) The attorney general shall not issue a license
pursuant to this act if the applicant:
(1) Is not a resident of the county where application for licensure
is made or is not a resident of the state;
(2) is prohibited from shipping, transporting, possessing or
receiving a firearm or ammunition under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g) or (n), and
amendments thereto, or K.S.A. 21-4204, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A.
21-6301(a)(10) through, (a)(13) or (a)(15) through (a)(18) or K.S.A.
21-6304(a)(1) through (a)(3) (a)(4), and amendments thereto; or
(3) (A) For a provisional license, is less than 18 years of age; or
(B) for a standard license, is less than 21 years of age.
(b) (1) The attorney general shall adopt rules and regulations
establishing procedures and standards as authorized by this act for an
eight-hour handgun safety and training course required by this section.
Such standards shall include:
(A) A requirement that trainees receive training in the safe storage
of handguns, actual firing of handguns and instruction in the laws of
this state governing the carrying of concealed handguns and the use of
deadly force;
(B) general guidelines for courses which are compatible with the
industry standard for basic handgun training for civilians;
(C) qualifications of instructors; and
(D) a requirement that the course be:
(i) A handgun course certified or sponsored by the attorney
general; or
(ii) a handgun course certified or sponsored by the national rifle
association or by a law enforcement agency, college, private or public
institution or organization or handgun training school, if the attorney
general determines that such course meets or exceeds the standards
required by rules and regulations adopted by the attorney general and is
taught by instructors certified by the attorney general or by the national
rifle association, if the attorney general determines that the
requirements for certification of instructors by such association meet or
exceed the standards required by rules and regulations adopted by the
attorney general.
(2) Any person wanting to be certified by the attorney general as
an instructor shall submit to the attorney general an application in the
form required by the attorney general and a fee not to exceed $150.
(2)(3) The cost of the handgun safety and training course required
by this section shall be paid by the applicant. The following shall
constitute satisfactory evidence of satisfactory completion of an
approved handgun safety and training course:
(A) Evidence of completion of a course that satisfies the
requirements of subsection (b)(1), in the form provided by rules and
regulations adopted by the attorney general;
(B) an affidavit from the instructor, school, club, organization or
group that conducted or taught such course attesting to the completion
of the course by the applicant;
(C) evidence of completion of a course offered in another
jurisdiction which is determined by the attorney general to have
training requirements that are equal to or greater than those required by
this act; or
(D) a determination by the attorney general pursuant to subsection

HOUSE BILL No. 2052—page 2
(c).
(c) (1) The attorney general may:
(A) Create a list of concealed carry handgun licenses or permits
issued by other jurisdictions that the attorney general finds have
training requirements that are equal to or greater than those of this
state; and
(B) review each application received pursuant to K.S.A. 75-7c05,
and amendments thereto, to determine if the applicant's previous
training qualifications were equal to or greater than those of this state.
(2) For the purposes of this subsection:
(A) "Equal to or greater than" means the applicant's prior training
meets or exceeds the training established in this section by having
required, at a minimum, the applicant to:
(i) Receive instruction on the laws of self-defense; and
(ii) demonstrate training and competency in the safe handling,
storage and actual firing of handguns.
(B) "Jurisdiction" means another state or the District of Columbia.
(C) "License or permit" means a concealed carry handgun license
or permit from another jurisdiction that has not expired and, except for
any residency requirement of the issuing jurisdiction, is currently in
good standing.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-7c05 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-7c05. (a) The application for a license pursuant to this act
shall be completed, under oath, on a form prescribed by the attorney
general and shall only include:
(1) (A) Subject to the provisions of subsection (a)(1)(B), the
name, address, social security number, Kansas driver's license number
or Kansas nondriver's license identification number, place and date of
birth, a photocopy of the applicant's driver's license or nondriver's
identification card and a photocopy of the applicant's certificate of
training course completion; or
(B) in the case of an applicant who presents proof that such person
is on active duty with any branch of the armed forces of the United
States, or is the dependent of such a person, and who does not possess a
Kansas driver's license or Kansas nondriver's license identification, the
number of such license or identification shall not be required;
(2) a statement that the applicant is in compliance with criteria
contained within K.S.A. 75-7c04, and amendments thereto;
(3) a statement that the applicant has been furnished a copy of this
act and is knowledgeable of its provisions;
(4) a conspicuous warning that the application is executed under
oath and that a false answer to any question, or the submission of any
false document by the applicant, subjects the applicant to criminal
prosecution under K.S.A. 21-5903, and amendments thereto; and
(5) a statement that the applicant desires a concealed handgun
license as a means of lawful self-defense.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (i) (j), the applicant
shall submit to the sheriff of the county where the applicant resides,
during any normal business hours:
(1) A completed application described in subsection (a);
(2) an amount of $32.50 payable to the sheriff of the county where
the applicant resides for the purpose of covering the cost of taking
fingerprints pursuant to subsection (c);
(3) if applicable, a photocopy of the proof of training required by
K.S.A. 75-7c04(b)(1), and amendments thereto; and
(4) a full frontal view photograph of the applicant taken within the
preceding 30 days.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (i) (j), the
sheriff, upon receipt of the items listed in subsection (b), shall provide
for the full set of fingerprints of the applicant to be taken and forwarded
to the attorney general for purposes of a criminal history records check
as provided by subsection (d). In addition, the sheriff shall forward the
application to the attorney general. Notwithstanding any provision in
this section to the contrary, an applicant shall not be required to submit

HOUSE BILL No. 2052—page 3
fingerprints for a renewal application under K.S.A. 75-7c08, and
amendments thereto.
(2) The sheriff of the applicant's county of residence or the chief
law enforcement officer of any law enforcement agency, at the sheriff's
or chief law enforcement officer's discretion, may participate in the
process by submitting a voluntary report to the attorney general
containing readily discoverable information, corroborated through
public records, which, when combined with another enumerated factor,
establishes that the applicant poses a significantly greater threat to law
enforcement or the public at large than the average citizen. Any such
voluntary reporting shall be made within 45 days after the date the
sheriff receives the application. Any sheriff or chief law enforcement
officer submitting a voluntary report shall not incur any civil or
criminal liability as the result of the good faith submission of such
report.
(3) All funds retained by the sheriff pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall be credited to a special fund of the sheriff's office
which shall be used solely for the purpose of administering this act.
(d) Each applicant shall be subject to a state and national criminal
history records check, including an inquiry of the national instant
criminal background check system, in accordance with K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 22-4714, and amendments thereto.
(e) Within 90 days after the date of receipt of the items listed in
subsection (b), the attorney general shall:
(1) (A) Issue the license and certify the issuance to the department
of revenue; and
(B) if it is impractical for the division of vehicles of the
department of revenue to issue physical cards consistent with the
requirements of this act and the attorney general has determined that
the conditions for such impracticality have existed for at least 30 days,
the attorney general shall issue an authorization document in
accordance with K.S.A. 75-7c03(d), and amendments thereto; or
(2) deny the application based solely on: (A) The report submitted
by the sheriff or other chief law enforcement officer under subsection
(c)(2) for good cause shown therein; or (B) the ground that the
applicant is disqualified under the criteria listed in K.S.A. 75-7c04, and
amendments thereto. If the attorney general denies the application, the
attorney general shall notify the applicant in writing, stating the ground
for denial and informing the applicant the opportunity for a hearing
pursuant to the Kansas administrative procedure act.
(f) (1) Any person who holds a provisional license issued pursuant
to this act may, on reaching the age of 21 years, submit a request to the
attorney general to have a standard license issued to such person.
Upon confirmation that such person is at least 21 years of age, the
attorney general shall issue a standard license to such person in
accordance with this act. The term of such standard license shall be for
the remaining unexpired portion of the term of such person's
provisional license.
(2) The attorney general shall notify each person holding a
provisional license at least 60 days prior to such person's 21st birthday
that such person may apply for a standard license to be issued on the
person's 21st birthday.
(g) No person who is issued a license or has such license renewed
shall be required to pay a fee for the cost of the license or renewal
except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) for the purpose of
covering the cost of taking fingerprints.
(g)(h) (1) A person who is a retired law enforcement officer, as
defined in K.S.A. 21-5111, and amendments thereto, shall be:
(A) Exempt from the required completion of a handgun safety and
training course if such person was certified by the Kansas commission
on peace officer's standards and training, or similar body from another
jurisdiction, not more than eight years prior to submission of the
application; and
(B) required to comply with the criminal history records check

HOUSE BILL No. 2052—page 4
requirement of this section.
(2) Proof of retirement as a law enforcement officer shall be
required and provided to the attorney general in the form of a letter
from the agency head, or their designee, of the officer's retiring agency
that attests to the officer having retired in good standing from that
agency as a law enforcement officer for reasons other than mental
instability and that the officer has a nonforfeitable right to benefits
under a retirement plan of the agency.
(h)(i) A person who is a corrections officer, a parole officer or a
corrections officer employed by the federal bureau of prisons, as
defined by K.S.A. 75-5202, and amendments thereto, shall be:
(1) Exempt from the required completion of a handgun safety and
training course if such person was issued a certificate of firearms
training by the department of corrections or the federal bureau of
prisons or similar body not more than one year prior to submission of
the application; and
(2) required to comply with the criminal history records check
requirement of this section.
(i)(j) A person who presents proof that such person is on active
duty with any branch of the armed forces of the United States and is
stationed at a United States military installation located outside this
state, may submit by mail an application described in subsection (a)
and the other materials required by subsection (b) to the sheriff of the
county where the applicant resides. Provided the applicant is
fingerprinted at a United States military installation, the applicant may
submit a full set of fingerprints of such applicant along with the
application. Upon receipt of such items, the sheriff shall forward to the
attorney general the application.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 75-7c07 is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
7c07. (a) In accordance with the provisions of the Kansas
administrative procedure act, the attorney general shall deny a license
or the renewal thereof to any applicant for license who is ineligible for
such license under K.S.A. 75-7c04, and amendments thereto, and,
except as provided by subsection (b), shall revoke at any time the
license of any person who would be becomes ineligible for such license
under K.S.A. 75-7c04, and amendments thereto, if submitting an
application for a license at such time. Review by the district court in
accordance with the Kansas judicial review act shall be, at the option of
the party seeking review, in Shawnee county or the county in which the
petitioner resides. The revocation shall remain in effect pending any
appeal and shall not be stayed by the court.
(b) The license of a person who is charged for an offense or is
subject to a proceeding that could render the person ineligible pursuant
to subsection (a) of K.S.A. 75-7c04(a), and amendments thereto, shall
be subject to suspension and shall be reinstated upon final disposition
of the charge or outcome of the proceeding as long as the arrest or
proceeding does not result in a disqualifying conviction, commitment,
finding or order.
(c) The sheriff of the county where a restraining order is issued
that would prohibit issuance of a license under subsection (a)(2) of
K.S.A. 75-7c04(a)(2), and amendments thereto, shall notify the
attorney general immediately upon receipt of such order. If the person
subject to the restraining order holds a license issued pursuant to this
act, the attorney general immediately shall suspend such license upon
receipt of notice of the issuance of such order. The attorney general
shall adopt rules and regulations establishing procedures which allow
for 24-hour notification and suspension of a license under the
circumstances described in this subsection. The attorney general shall
immediately reinstate the license, if it has not otherwise expired, upon
proof of the cancellation of the order.
(d) Upon the suspension or revocation of a license issued
pursuant to this act, the licensee shall surrender the physical license
card or authorization document issued pursuant to K.S.A. 75-7c03(d),
and amendments thereto, to the division of motor vehicles. Upon

HOUSE BILL No. 2052—page 5
receipt by the division, such physical license card or authorization
document shall be destroyed. Upon the conclusion of such suspension,
the attorney general shall issue an authorization document for the
license to be reissued for the remaining unexpired portion of the term
of such person's license.
(e) (1) If the provisions of paragraph (2) are met, a license issued
pursuant to this act shall not be revoked until 90 days after the person
issued such license is no longer a resident of this state, if being a
nonresident of this state is the only grounds for revocation.
(2) A license issued pursuant to this act shall be considered valid
for 90 days after a licensee is no longer a resident of Kansas, provided
that:
(A) Prior to the change in residency, the licensee notified the
attorney general in writing of the pending change; and
(B) the licensee's new state of residence, or any other state or
jurisdiction that such licensee travels to during the 90-day period,
would recognize such license as valid.
(e)(f) A person who has been issued a license pursuant to this act
and who gave up residency in this state, but has returned to reside in
this state shall be eligible to have their license reinstated as valid
provided that:
(1) The license has not expired; and
(2) (A) the licensee notified the attorney general in writing of both
the residency departure and relocation back to this state; or
(B) if such licensee failed to comply with the notification
requirements of this subsection, the penalty provisions of subsection (e)
of K.S.A. 75-7c06(e), and amendments thereto, have been satisfied.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-7c08 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-7c08. (a) Not less than 90 days prior to the expiration date
of the license, the attorney general shall mail to the licensee a written
notice of the expiration and a renewal form prescribed by the attorney
general. The licensee shall renew the license on or before the expiration
date by filing with the attorney general the renewal form, a notarized
affidavit, either in person or by certified mail, stating that the licensee
remains qualified pursuant to the criteria specified in K.S.A. 75-7c04,
and amendments thereto, and a full frontal view photograph of the
applicant taken within the preceding 30 days to the attorney general.
The attorney general shall complete a name-based background check,
including a search of the national instant criminal background check
system database. A renewal application is considered filed on the date
the renewal form and affidavit are delivered in person to the attorney
general's office or on the date a certified mailing to the attorney
general's office containing these items is postmarked.
(b) Upon receipt of a renewal application as specified in
subsection (a), a background check in accordance with K.S.A. 75-
7c05(d), and amendments thereto, shall be completed. Fingerprints
shall not be required for renewal applications. If the licensee is not
disqualified as provided by this act, the license shall be renewed upon
receipt by the attorney general of the items listed in subsection (a) and
the completion of the background check. If the licensee holds a valid
provisional license at the time the renewal application is submitted and
has not been issued a standard license pursuant to K.S.A. 75-7c05(f),
and amendments thereto, then the attorney general shall issue a
standard license to the licensee if the licensee is not disqualified as
provided by this act.
(c) No license shall be renewed if the renewal application is filed
six months or more after the expiration date of the license, and such
license shall be deemed to be permanently expired. A person whose
license has been permanently expired may reapply for licensure but an
application for licensure pursuant to K.S.A. 75-7c05, and amendments
thereto, shall be submitted, and a background investigation including
the submission of fingerprints, shall be conducted pursuant to the
provisions of that section.

HOUSE BILL No. 2052—page 6
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 75-7c22 is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
7c22. (a) (1) An off-duty law enforcement officer may carry a
concealed handgun in any building where an on-duty law enforcement
officer would be authorized to carry a concealed handgun regardless of
whether the requirements of K.S.A. 75-7c10 or 75-7c20, and
amendments thereto, for prohibiting the carrying of a concealed
handgun in such building have been satisfied, provided:
(1)(A) Such officer is in compliance with the firearms policies of
such officer's law enforcement agency; and
(2)(B) such officer possesses identification required by such
officer's law enforcement agency and presents such identification when
requested by another law enforcement officer or by a person of
authority for the building where the carrying of concealed handguns is
otherwise prohibited.
(2) No person of authority for a building shall require, request or
record personal information of any off-duty law enforcement officer
entering such building in accordance with this section, including, but
not limited to, such officer's email address, home phone number or
home address, nor shall such officer be required to wear any item
identifying such officer as a law enforcement officer or as being armed.
(b) A law enforcement officer from another state or a retired law
enforcement officer meeting the requirements of the federal law
enforcement officers safety act, 18 U.S.C. §§ 926B and 926C, may
carry a concealed handgun in any building where an on-duty law
enforcement officer would be authorized to carry a concealed handgun
regardless of whether the requirements of K.S.A. 75-7c10 or 75-7c20,
and amendments thereto, for prohibiting the carrying of a concealed
handgun in such building have been satisfied, provided, such officer
possesses identification required by the federal law enforcement
officers safety act and presents such identification when requested by
another law enforcement officer or by a person of authority for the
building where the carrying of concealed handguns is otherwise
prohibited.
(c) Any law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer
who is issued a license to carry a concealed handgun under the personal
and family protection act shall be subject to the provisions of that act,
except that for any such law enforcement officer or retired law
enforcement officer who satisfies the requirements of either subsection
(a) or (b) the provisions of this section shall control with respect to
where a concealed handgun may be carried.
(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any building
where the possession of firearms is prohibited or restricted by an order
of the chief judge of a judicial district, or by federal law or regulation.
(e) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any law
enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer who has been
denied a license to carry a concealed handgun pursuant to K.S.A. 75-
7c04, and amendments thereto, or whose license to carry a concealed
handgun has been suspended or revoked in accordance with the
provisions of the personal and family protection act.
(f) As used in this section:
(1) "Law enforcement officer" means:
(A) Any person employed by a law enforcement agency, who is in
good standing and is certified under the Kansas law enforcement
training act;
(B) a law enforcement officer who has obtained a similar
designation in a jurisdiction outside the state of Kansas but within the
United States; or
(C) a federal law enforcement officer who as part of such officer's
duties is permitted to make arrests and to be armed.
(2) "Person of authority" means any person who is tasked with
screening persons entering the building, or who otherwise has the
authority to determine whether a person may enter or remain in the
building.
(g) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the personal

HOUSE BILL No. 2052—page 7
and family protection act.
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 75-7c07 and 75-7c22 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-
7c04, 75-7c05 and 75-7c08 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 7. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the House, and passed
that body
HOUSE concurred in
SENATE amendments
__________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
______________________________________________________________________________
Governor.